Hawaii statutes.
§425E-208 Liability for false
information in a filed record. (a) If a record delivered to the
director for filing under this chapter contains false information, any person
that suffers loss by reliance on the false information may recover damages for
the loss from:

(1) Any person who executes the record, or causes
another to execute it on the person's behalf, and knew the information to be
false or should have known the information was false at the time the record was
executed; and

(2) Any general partner who has notice that the
information was false when the record was filed or has become false because of
changed circumstances, if the general partner has notice for a reasonably
sufficient time before the information is relied upon to enable the general
partner to effect an amendment under section 425E-202, file a petition pursuant
to section 425E-205, or deliver to the director for filing a statement of
change pursuant to section 425R-7 or a certificate of correction pursuant to
section 425E-207.

(b) Signing a record authorized or required to
be filed under this chapter constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of
perjury that the facts stated in the record are true. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1;
am L 2009, c 55, §44]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next